test/src/morphology/N-keeratwks_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - kēratõks: # Noun 207 'eng /est kirjutis/fin' - full paradigm
     kēratõks+N+Sg+Nom: kēratõks
     kēratõks+N+Sg+Gen: kēratõks
     kēratõks+N+Sg+Par: kēratõkst
     kēratõks+N+Sg+Dat: kēratõksõn
     kēratõks+N+Sg+Ins: kēratõksõks
     kēratõks+N+Sg+Ill: kēratõksõ
     kēratõks+N+Sg+Ela: kēratõksõst
     kēratõks+N+Pl+Nom: kēratõkst
     kēratõks+N+Pl+Gen: kēratõkst
     kēratõks+N+Pl+Par: kēratõkši
     kēratõks+N+Pl+Dat: kēratõkstõn
     kēratõks+N+Pl+Ins: kēratõkstõks
     kēratõks+N+Pl+Ill: kēratõkšiz
     kēratõks+N+Pl+Ela: kēratõkšist
